North Carolina, session 2025, SB419.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Section 3K.1 of S.L. 2024-57 is repealed.
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies retroactively to
December 11, 2024. Any adopted ordinance affected by Section 3K.1 of S.L. 2024-57 shall be
in effect as it was on or before December 11, 2024.
*S419-v-1*